Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.040

Application for license.

An application for a license shall be made to the department upon forms provided by the department and shall contain such information as the department reasonably requires, which shall include affirmative evidence of ability to comply with such rules as are lawfully adopted by the department.

[ 2000 c 47 s 2; 1957 c 253 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 47: See note following RCW 18.20.020.